Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 12.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-6201
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature
finds and declares:

(1) The purpose
of the nameplate capacity tax levied under section 77-6203 is to replace property
taxes currently imposed on wind infrastructure and depreciated over a short
period of time in a way that causes local budgeting challenges and increases
upfront costs for wind developers;

(2) The nameplate capacity tax should be
competitive with taxes imposed directly and indirectly on wind generation
and development in other states;

(3) The nameplate capacity tax should be
fair and nondiscriminatory when compared with other taxes imposed on other
industries in the state; and

(4) The nameplate capacity tax should not
be singled out as a source of General Fund revenue during times of economic
hardship.

Laws 2010, LB1048, § 12.